Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.085

Economic development programs.

It shall be in the public purpose for all counties to engage in economic development programs. In addition, counties may contract with nonprofit corporations in furtherance of this and other acts relating to economic development.

[ 1985 c 92 s 2.]